Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.150

Schools—Compliance with chapter.

Schools shall be audited and inspected by the director or the director's designee for compliance with this chapter at least once a year. If the director determines that a licensed school is not maintaining the standards required according to this chapter, written notice thereof shall be given to the school. A school which fails to correct these conditions to the satisfaction of the director within a reasonable time may be subject to penalties imposed under RCW 18.235.110.

[ 2002 c 86 s 215; 1997 c 178 s 1; 1991 c 324 s 12; 1984 c 208 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.